Illinois, session 104th, SB3539.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 235 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/235 new)7    Sec. 235. Manufacturing capital expenditure credit. For 8taxable years that begin on or after January 1, 2026 and begin 9prior to January 1, 2036, each taxpayer that is engaged in the 10business of manufacturing (North American Industry 11Classification System code 31-33) is entitled to a credit 12against the taxes imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 13Section 201 in an amount equal to 10% of the capital 14expenditures incurred by the taxpayer during the taxable year 15that are related to manufacturing. The total amount of credits 16awarded under this Section may not exceed $10,000,000 for any 17particular taxpayer in any taxable year. However, 18notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, if the 19capital investment is made in a rural or economically 20challenged area, as determined by the Department of Commerce 21and Economic Opportunity, then the amount of the credit shall 22be 15% of the capital expenditure, and the maximum amount 23awarded under this Section for any particular taxpayer in any   SB3539- 2 -LRB104 19314 HLH 32760 b1taxable year shall be $20,000,000. A taxpayer may not claim a 2credit under this Section if the taxpayer claims a credit 3against the taxes imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 4Section 201 for the same capital expenditure under any other 5provision of law.6    In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce the 7taxpayer's liability under this Act to less than zero. The 8credit may not be carried forward or back.  9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.